apertium-srd.srd.dix
<pardef n="p/òdere" c="p.47">
  <e>       <p><l>òdere</l>     <r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oder</l>      <r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>odende</l>    <r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odende</l>    <r><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>odendi</l>    <r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>odendi</l>    <r><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>otzo</l>      <r><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odes</l>      <r><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>odet</l>      <r><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>odit</l>      <r><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>odat</l>      <r><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>odimus</l>    <r><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odides</l>    <r><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>odint</l>     <r><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oden</l>      <r><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>odent</l>     <r><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>odia</l>      <r><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odias</l>     <r><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odiat</l>     <r><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odìamus</l>   <r><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>odiamus</l>   <r><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>odiais</l>    <r><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odiant</l>    <r><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>otza</l>      <r><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otzas</l>     <r><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otzat</l>     <r><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otzamus</l>   <r><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otzais</l>    <r><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>odant</l>     <r><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>otzant</l>    <r><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>odere</l>     <r><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oderes</l>    <r><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oderet</l>    <r><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oderemus</l>  <r><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odereis</l>   <r><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oderent</l>   <r><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ode</l>       <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ode</l>       <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otzat</l>     <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otzamus</l>   <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otzamus</l>   <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odide</l>     <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odide</l>     <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otzant</l>    <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>òdidu</l>     <r><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>òdida</l>     <r><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>òdidos</l>    <r><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>òdidas</l>    <r><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="p/òdere__vblex" c="p.47">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>òdere<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="p/òdere"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="p/òdere__vbmod" c="p.47">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>òdere<s n="vbmod"/></r></p><par n="p/òdere"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="pòdere">          <i>p</i><par n="p/òdere__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pòdere">          <i>p</i><par n="p/òdere__vbmod"/></e>
